Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5729.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-22-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-22 entitled
"Miscellaneous Rules" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-22-9. Throwing debris on highway — Snow removal.
(a) No person shall throw or deposit upon or cause to be blown onto any highway or
roadway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, grass/grass clippings, or any other
substance likely to injure any person, animal, or vehicle or cause a hazard upon the highway or
roadway, or likely to deface the beauty or cleanliness of the highway or roadway, nor shall any
person in removing snow from any driveway, public or private, leave the snow in any condition so
as to constitute a hazard on the highway or roadway.
(b) The director of transportation shall post signs advising the public of penalties for
throwing debris on the highways or roadways.
(c) Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002072
========